Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2008
Rules, orders of state patrol; failure to obey; penalty.

Any person who fails or refuses to obey any lawful traffic direction or any lawful order of the superintendent or any of the subordinate officers or employees of the Nebraska State Patrol or who resists lawful arrest by the superintendent or any of his subordinate officers or employees, shall be deemed guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1937, c. 141, § 7, p. 509;

Laws 1941, c. 176, § 9, p. 692;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-422;

R.S.1943, § 60-436;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 83;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-436.

Evidence that defendant refused to obey an order of the Nebraska State Patrol to remove a flagpole from the Nebraska State Capitol building or to leave was sufficient to support a conviction for failing to obey a lawful order. State v. Kalita, 317 Neb. 906, 12 N.W.3d 499 (2024).